Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4814.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406zz. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for any medically necessary care or treatment for menopause and perimenopause, including, but not limited to, treatment that is hormone replacement therapy or otherwise approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (2) An insurer described in subsection (1) shall not require a prior authorization or require an insured to be subject to step therapy or fail-first policy or protocol for the administration or prescription of any medication administered or prescribed for hormone replacement therapy used to treat symptoms of menopause and perimenopause. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Menopause" means the permanent cessation of menstruation due to loss of ovarian follicular function. (b) "Perimenopause" means the transition period in which an individual is near the end of the individual's reproductive years or at the onset of menopause. (c) "Prior authorization" means that term as defined in section 2212e.